Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2411
Judgments for fines, costs, and forfeited recognizances; execution in other counties.

Executions for fines and costs of prosecution, and on recognizances taken in pursuance of section 29-2409, may be issued into any county in this state.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 527, p. 838;

R.S.1913, § 9198;

C.S.1922, § 10205;

C.S.1929, § 29-2411;

R.S.1943, § 29-2411.